Utah statutes.
72-4-133.   State highways -- SR-271, SR-273 to SR-276, SR-279, SR-280.

State highways include:

(1)  SR-271.  From Route 274 in Parowan northeasterly to Route 15 north of Paragonah.

(2)  SR-273.  From Route 89 at North Farmington Interchange northerly to Kaysville; then west on 200 North to Route 15.

(3)  SR-274.  From Route 143 in Parowan north on Main Street to Route 15 north of Parowan.

(4)  SR-275.  From Route 95 northwesterly to the east boundary of Natural Bridges National Monument.

(5)  SR-276.  From Route 95 southerly to Glen Canyon National Recreation Area boundary near Bullfrog Basin then beginning again at the Glen Canyon National Recreation Area boundary east of Halls Crossing easterly to Route 95.

(6)  SR-279.  From the Potash Plant north along the Colorado River to Route 191 north of Moab.

(7)  SR-280.  From Route 80 near the south limits of Coalville easterly to Main Street in Coalville.



Amended by Chapter 79, 2006 General Session

